District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.13

Performance plan; independent audit; evaluation.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 14, 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1102(d), 46 DCR 6373
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1302, 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2295.13.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1102(d) of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1202 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).

Emergency Legislation